Utah statutes.
63M-7-404.   Purpose -- Duties.
The purpose of the commission shall be to develop guidelines and propose
recommendations to the Legislature, the governor, and the Judicial Council
about the sentencing and release of juvenile and adult offenders in order to:
(1)  respond to public comment;
(2)  relate sentencing practices and correctional resources;
(3)  increase equity in criminal sentencing;
(4)  better define responsibility in criminal sentencing; and
(5)  enhance the discretion of sentencing judges while preserving the role of
the Board of Pardons and Parole and the Youth Parole Authority.
